Utah statutes.
75-5-308.   Visitor in guardianship proceeding.

A visitor is, with respect to guardianship proceedings, a person who is trained in law, nursing, or social work and is an officer, employee, or special appointee of the court with no personal interest in the proceedings.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

